apertium-evn.evn-relaxed.lexc
%<invquest%>          ! Inverted question mark (¿)
%<multipl%>           ! Division sign (×)
%<division%>          ! Division sign (÷)
%<punct%>             ! Other


! Archiphonemes and escaped symbols
%{i%}                 ! -и -ы -ø
%{A%}                 ! -а -э -о
%{Э%}                 ! -а -э -о allows all
%{Я%}                 ! -а -э -о -я -е -ё
%{Е%}                 ! -а -э -о -я -е -ё allows all
%{L%}                 ! -л -р
%{D%}                 ! -д -т
%{V%}                 ! -в -м
%{В%}                 ! -в -м -б
%{G%}                 ! -г -к -ӈ
%{Г%}                 ! -г -к -ӈ -в
%{N%}                 ! -н -т
%{u%}                 ! -у -ø
%{r%}                 ! -р -т -л -н -ø
%{g%}                 ! -г -к -ø
%{ъ%}                 ! -ъ -ø
%{ы%}                 ! -ы -ø

%{Ч%}                 ! -ч -с -ш -щ ! Dir/LR
%{О%}                 ! -о -ё -э ! Dir/LR
%{Б%}                 ! -б -п -к ! Dir/LR
%{n%}                 ! remove previous n
 
%{а%}                 ! for Vow1 vowel harmony (suffixes with -а -я are chosen)
%{э%}                 ! for Vow2 vowel harmony (suffixes with -э -е are chosen)
%{ч%}                 ! т -> ч and triggers и instead of ы after ч
%{д%}                 ! т -> д and triggers и instead of ы after д
%{ь%}                 ! triggers и instead of ы
!%{t%}                 ! behaves like a voiceless consonant 
%{ː%}
%{☭%}

%>                    ! Morpheme boundary
%                     ! Space
%-                  

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Numerals ; 
Pronouns ;
Postpositions ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Verbs ;
Interjections ;
Conjunctions ;
Particles ;
ProperNouns ;
Abbreviations ;
Punctuation ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLITICS

# ;
%<clit-da%>:%>%-%{D%}%{Э%}%{ː%} CLITICS ; ! ""
%<clit-da%>:%>%{D%}%{Э%}%{ː%} CLITICS ; ! ! Dir/LR
%<clit-val%>:%>%-%{V%}%{Э%}л CLITICS ; ! 'any'
%<clit-val%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}л CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-valin%>:%>%-%{V%}%{Э%}лин CLITICS ;
%<clit-valin%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}лин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-sa%>:%>%-с%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<clit-sa%>:%>с%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-ngna%>:%>%-ӈн%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<clit-ngna%>:%>ӈн%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-ngan%>:%>%-ӈ%{Э%}н CLITICS ;
%<clit-ngan%>:%>ӈ%{Э%}н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-kan%>:%>%-к%{Э%}н CLITICS ;
%<clit-kan%>:%>к%{Э%}н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-kanan%>:%>%-к%{Э%}н%{Э%}н CLITICS ;
%<clit-kanan%>:%>к%{Э%}н%{Э%}н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-mak%>:%>%-м%{Э%}к CLITICS ;
%<clit-mak%>:%>м%{Э%}к CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-var%>:%>%-%{V%}%{Э%}р CLITICS ; ! пар кар
%<clit-var%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}р CLITICS ; ! пар кар ! Dir/LR
%<clit-ka%>:%>%-к%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<clit-ka%>:%>к%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-ta%>:%>%-т%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<clit-ta%>:%>т%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-kun%>:%>%-кун CLITICS ;
%<clit-kun%>:%>кун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-mat%>:%>%-м%{Э%}т CLITICS ;
%<clit-mat%>:%>м%{Э%}т CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-nun%>:%>%-нун CLITICS ;
%<clit-nun%>:%>нун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-luvar%>:%>%-лув%{Э%}р CLITICS ;
%<clit-luvar%>:%>лув%{Э%}р CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-vasi%>:%>%-в%{Э%}си CLITICS ;
%<clit-vasi%>:%>в%{Э%}си CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-vasin%>:%>%-в%{Э%}син CLITICS ;
%<clit-vasin%>:%>в%{Э%}син CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-puna%>:%>%-пуня CLITICS ;
%<clit-puna%>:%>пуня CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-dak%>:%>%-д%{Э%}к CLITICS ;
%<clit-dak%>:%>д%{Э%}к CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-na%>:%>%-н%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<clit-na%>:%>н%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-gu%>:%>%-%{G%}у CLITICS ;
%<clit-gu%>:%>%{G%}у CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<clit-sinča%>:%>%-синч%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! or not clit?
%<clit-sinča%>:%>синч%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! or not clit? ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NUM 

%<num%>: CLITICS ;
%<num%>%<nmlz%>: NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{g%}и CLITICS ; ! add exceptions
%<num%>%<coll1%>:%>ни CLITICS ; ! обозначает совокупность лиц
%<num%>%<coll2%>:%>ӈн%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! обозначает совокупность животных
%<num%>%<coll3%>:%>р%{Э%}гд%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! обозначает совокупность предметов
%<num%>%<coll4%>:%>лл%{Э%} N ; ! обозначает количество суток
%<num%>%<coll5%>:%>нну N ; ! пу обозначает количество юрт, стоящих вместе ! Fixme
%<num%>%<coll6%>:%>мус%{Э%} N ; ! обозначает количество мест, направлений
%<num%>%<coll7%>:%>нм%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! обозначает количество мест, направлений


LEXICON NUM-N

%<num%>:н CLITICS ;
%<num%>%<nmlz%>: NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{g%}и CLITICS ; ! add exceptions
%<num%>%<coll1%>:%>ни CLITICS ; ! обозначает совокупность лиц
%<num%>%<coll2%>:%>ӈн%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! обозначает совокупность животных
%<num%>%<coll3%>:%>р%{Э%}гд%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! обозначает совокупность предметов
%<num%>%<coll4%>:%>лл%{Э%} N ; ! обозначает количество суток
%<num%>%<coll5%>:%>нну N ; ! пу обозначает количество юрт, стоящих вместе
%<num%>%<coll6%>:%>нмус%{Э%} N-N ; ! обозначает количество мест, направлений

%<vblz%>:%>в%{u%} VERB ; ! to the ordinal numerals from 'second' to 'ninth'

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;
%<post%>: POSS-SG-PX ; ! exclude clitics? 

LEXICON CONJ

%<conj%>: CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADV

CLITICS ;

%<ints1%>:%>к%{Э%}ку%{ː%}н CLITICS ;
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints3%>:%>т%{Э%}н%{Э%} CLITICS ;

%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADV-DERIV

%<attr1%>:%>ни N ;
%<attr2%>:%>пты A ;
%<attr3%>:%>гу A ;
%<attr4%>:%>ву A ;
%<attr5%>:%>р A ;

LEXICON ADVERB

%<adv%>: ADV ;
%<adv%>: ADV-DERIV ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON PART

%<part%>: CLITICS ;

!====================!
! Nominal inflection !
!====================!

! stem - [alienable poss.] - number - case - [pers/refl. poss.]

LEXICON POSS-SG-PX

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}в CLITICS ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}с CLITICS ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>%{i%}н CLITICS ; 
%<px1pe%>:%>%{i%}вун CLITICS ;
%<px1pi%>:%>%{i%}т CLITICS ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}сун CLITICS ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}тын CLITICS ;
%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}тин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON POSS-SG-WITHOUT-REF

CLITICS ;
POSS-SG-PX ;

LEXICON POSS-REF

%<ref-sg%>:%>%{V%}и%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<ref-sg%>:%>%{Б%}и%{ː%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<ref-sg%>:%>и CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<ref-sg%>:%>йи CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<ref-pl%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}р CLITICS ;
%<ref-pl%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}л CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<ref-pl%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%}л CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON POSS-SG-REF

POSS-SG-PX ;
POSS-REF ;

LEXICON POSS-SG-CLITICS

POSS-SG-WITHOUT-REF ;
POSS-REF ;

LEXICON POSS-SG-N-REF

POSS-REF ;

%<px1sg%>:%>ми%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<px1sg%>:%{n%}%>м CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2sg%>:%>ни CLITICS ;
%<px3sg%>:%>ин CLITICS ; 
%<px1pe%>:%>мун CLITICS ;
%<px1pi%>:%>ты CLITICS ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>нун CLITICS ;
%<px3pl%>:%>тын CLITICS ;
%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}тин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON POSS-SG-N-CLITICS

POSS-SG-N-REF ;
CLITICS ;

LEXICON POSS-PL

POSS-REF ;

%<px1sg%>:%>ви%{ː%} CLITICS ; 
%<px1sg%>:%>би%{ː%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2sg%>:%>%{L%}и CLITICS ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>ин CLITICS ; 
%<px1pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ; 
%<px1pe%>:%>бун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<px1pi%>:%>ты CLITICS ; 
%<px1pi%>:%>ип CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<px1pi%>:%>пи CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2pl%>:%>%{L%}ун CLITICS ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>тын CLITICS ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}тин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON POSS-PL-CLITICS

CLITICS ;
POSS-PL ;

LEXICON CASE-OBL

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%} CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<ind%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Е%} CLITICS ;
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук CLITICS ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} CLITICS ;
%<com-nun%>:%>нун CLITICS ;
%<com-nan%>:%>н%{Э%}н CLITICS ;
%<com-gali%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
бӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:би%{ː%}%{э%} CLITICS ;
сӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:си%{ː%}%{э%} CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:нуӈан CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ма%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>мэ%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ду%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<locall%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>дула%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<all%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈат%>тыки%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<prl%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>дули%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>икла%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>икли%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>дук%>ин CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ela%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈид%>ин CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ди%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<com-nun%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>нун%>ин CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<com-gali%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈали%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px3sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л%>ин CLITICS ;
бӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pe%>%<nom%>:бу%{ː%}%{э%} CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<nom%>:ми%{э%}т CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мит%>вэ CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мит%>пэ CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<locdir%>:мит%>тыклэ%{ː%} CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<allprl%>:мит%>тыкли%{ː%}%{э%} CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<ins%>:мит%>ы%{э%}т CLITICS ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<nom%>:му%{э%}т CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мут%>вэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мут%>пэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<locdir%>:мут%>тыклэ%{ː%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<allprl%>:мут%>тыкли%{ː%}%{э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>%<ins%>:мут%>ы%{э%}т CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
сӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:су%{ː%}%{э%} CLITICS ;
 LEXICON Adverbs
аракукан:аракукан ADVERB ; ! "медленно"
эимкунди:эимкунди ADVERB ; ! "легко"
гугдат:гугдат ADVERB ; ! "высоко"
урумит:урумит ADVERB ; ! "коротко"! couldn't find in freq_list
иӈинипчут:иӈинипчут ADVERB ; ! "холодно"! couldn't find in freq_list
хэкупчут:хэкупчут ADVERB ; ! "жарко"
нуркуптыки:нуркуптыки ADVERB ; ! "ничком"! couldn't find in freq_list
эвэсиптыки:эвэсиптыки ADVERB ; ! "повернувшись в эту сторону"
аран:аран ADVERB ; ! "едва"
нэлки:нэлки ADVERB ; ! "весной ранней"
тыргакакин:тыргакакин ADVERB ; ! "в полдень"
ирбэлэсэ:ирбэлэсэ ADVERB ; ! "в период икрометания"
тынивэ:тынивэ ADVERB ; ! "вчера"
горово:горово ADVERB ; ! "долго"
адӣка̄н:ади%{ː%}ка%{ː%}н ADVERB ; ! немного
амаскӣ:амаски%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! назад
амаски:амаски ADVERB ; ! раньше
вэк:вэк ADVERB ; ! все.время
долбо:долбо ADVERB ; ! ночью
дюло̄скӣ:дюло%{ː%}ски%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! вперед
е̄да:е%{ː%}да ADVERB ; ! зачем
ӣло̄:и%{ː%}ло%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! где
иртики:иртики ADVERB ; ! куда! couldn't find in freq_list
мумӈэт:мумӈэт ADVERB ; ! напрямик
ня̄н:ня%{ː%}н ADVERB ; ! опять
са̄скӣ:са%{ː%}ски%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! дальше
тадук:тадук ADVERB ; ! оттуда
тадук%<adv%>%<ref-pl%>:тадук%>пэр CLITICS ; ! потом
таду:таду ADVERB ; ! там
та̄лэ̄:та%{ː%}лэ%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! туда
то̄лӣ:то%{ː%}ли%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! тогда
туе:туе ADVERB ; ! так
тэгэминун:тэгэминун ADVERB ; ! завтра
угӣскӣ:уги%{ː%}ски%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! вверх! couldn't find in freq_list
ута̄лэ:ута%{ː%}лэ ADVERB ; ! раньше
хата:хата ADVERB ; ! вероятно
хэргӣскӣ:хэрги%{ː%}ски%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! вниз
эда̄:эда%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! зачем
эду:эду ADVERB ; ! здесь
эӈэнӣ:эӈэни%{ː%} ADVERB ; ! сильно
эрэ:эрэ ADVERB ; ! здесь
эхи:эхи ADVERB ; ! сейчас
вниз:вниз ADVERB ;
хоть:хоть ADVERB ;
эёкӣ:эёки%{ː%} ADVERB ;
